Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2712.03
Streamlined sales and use tax agreement; ratified; governing board; members.

(1) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement, as adopted by the streamlined sales tax implementing states on November 12, 2002, including amendments through December 31, 2024, is hereby ratified by the Legislature. The Governor shall enter into the agreement with one or more states to simplify and modernize sales and use tax administration in order to substantially reduce the burden of tax compliance for all sellers and for all types of commerce. In furtherance of the agreement, the Department of Revenue is authorized to act jointly with other states that are members under Articles VII or VIII of the agreement to establish standards for certification of a certified service provider and certified automated system and establish performance standards for multistate sellers. The department is further authorized to take other actions permissible under law reasonably required to implement the provisions set forth in the agreement. Other actions authorized by this section include, but are not limited to, the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations and the joint procurement, with other member states, of goods and services in furtherance of the agreement.

(2) The Tax Commissioner or his or her designee and two representatives of the Legislature appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council are authorized to represent Nebraska before the other member states under the agreement. The state also agrees to participate in and comply with the procedures of and decisions made by the governing board of the member states. These provisions of the agreement include the creation of the organization as provided in Article VII of the agreement, the requirements for state entry and withdrawal as provided in Article VIII of the agreement, amendments to the agreement as provided in Article IX of the agreement, and a dispute resolution process as provided in Article X of the agreement.

Laws 2001, LB 172, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 75;

Laws 2007, LB223, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB879, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB211, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB776, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB208, § 3.

Executive Board of the Legislative Council, see section 50-401.01.